Colorado, session 2026A, HB1251.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Access to justice is a basic principle of the rule of law and
ensures that all public and private people, institutions, and entities,
including the state, are held accountable to laws that are publicly adopted,
equally enforced, and independently adjudicated;
(b) Without access to justice, people would be unable to exercise
their rights, have their voices heard, challenge discrimination, or hold
decision-makers accountable;
(c) Providing civil legal aid to people with low incomes is vital to
Colorado's missions, including those that involve providing justice for
victims of intimate partner violence, ensuring that veterans receive their
well-earned benefits, protecting the elder population from abuse, fighting
human trafficking, and safeguarding access to necessities such as food
and shelter;
(d) Without access to civil legal representation, laws and
protections are often unenforceable for Coloradans with low incomes;
(e) Adequately funded legal aid in certain civil matters reinforces
-2- HB26-1251

the importance of the right to counsel to ensure a fair trial;
(f) Equal access to justice would have little effective meaning if
an individual could not afford that right on the basis of income; and
(g) The donation to the equal justice authority for the purpose of
obtaining the equal justice license plate supports users of Colorado courts
and promotes equal access to justice, legal aid, and court efficiency, and
the donation:
(I) Allows drivers who obtain the equal justice license plate to
display their support for equal access to justice and increased court
efficiency;
(II) Is an amount that is based on the overall cost of the services
provided by the equal justice authority; and
(III) Is not a tax.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that the lack of
access to civil legal justice is a problem that has serious social, legal,
economic, and political consequences, and the general assembly creates
the equal justice license plate to:
(a) Provide funding for equal access to justice in Colorado;
(b) Provide Colorado drivers a means to display their support of
equal access to justice; and
(c) Reaffirm the general assembly's commitment to equal access
to the civil legal process.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 42-3-272 as
follows:
42-3-272. Special plates - equal justice - legislative declaration.
(1) BEGINNING ON THE EARLIER OF JANUARY 1, 2028, OR WHEN
THE DEPARTMENT IS ABLE TO ISSUE THE PLATE, AND ONLY AFTER THE
-3- HB26-1251

DEPARTMENT HAS RECEIVED SUFFICIENT GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS
FROM PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SOURCES, AS PERMITTED IN SUBSECTION (7) OF
THIS SECTION, TO COVER THE COST OF CREATING THE PLATE AND ANY
OTHER RELATED ADMINISTRATIVE OR PROGRAMMING NEEDS, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE SPECIAL LICENSE PLATES TO QUALIFIED
APPLICANTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION FOR MOTORCYCLES,
PASSENGER CARS, TRUCKS, OR NONCOMMERCIAL OR RECREATIONAL
MOTOR VEHICLES THAT DO NOT EXCEED SIXTEEN THOUSAND POUNDS
EMPTY WEIGHT.
(2) (a) THE EQUAL JUSTICE LICENSE PLATE IS ESTABLISHED.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL USE A DESIGN FROM THE EQUAL
JUSTICE AUTHORITY, CREATED IN SECTION 13-5.7-202. THE DESIGN MUST
CONFORM TO DEPARTMENT STANDARDS AND BE APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) (a) A PERSON MAY APPLY FOR AN EQUAL JUSTICE LICENSE
PLATE IF THE PERSON PAYS THE TAXES AND FEES REQUIRED IN THIS
SECTION AND PAYS A DONATION, IN AN AMOUNT OF AT LEAST FIFTY
DOLLARS, AS SET BY THE EQUAL JUSTICE AUTHORITY BOARD PURSUANT TO
SECTION 13-5.7-208 (3), TO THE EQUAL JUSTICE AUTHORITY.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT RENEW THE REGISTRATION OF AN
EQUAL JUSTICE LICENSE PLATE UNLESS THE PERSON THAT WAS ISSUED THE
LICENSE PLATE PAYS A RENEWAL DONATION, IN AN AMOUNT OF AT LEAST
FIFTY DOLLARS, AS SET BY THE EQUAL JUSTICE AUTHORITY BOARD
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-5.7-208 (3), TO THE EQUAL JUSTICE AUTHORITY.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT THE EQUAL JUSTICE LICENSE
PLATE DONATION REQUIRED IN SUBSECTIONS (3)(a) AND (3)(b) OF THIS
SECTION ON BEHALF OF THE EQUAL JUSTICE AUTHORITY IN THE SAME
-4- HB26-1251

MANNER IN WHICH THE DEPARTMENT COLLECTS OTHER TAXES AND FEES;
EXCEPT THAT THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT TRANSMIT THE COLLECTED
DONATION TO THE STATE TREASURER FOR DEPOSIT IN A STATE FUND BUT
SHALL REMIT THE MONEY TO THE EQUAL JUSTICE AUTHORITY.
(d) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT
DONATIONS RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (3)(a) AND (3)(b) OF THIS
SECTION ARE CUSTODIAL FUNDS AND, THEREFORE, ARE NOT SUBJECT TO
APPROPRIATION OR TO SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(4) THE AMOUNT OF THE TAXES AND FEES FOR A SPECIAL LICENSE
PLATE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION IS THE SAME AS THE AMOUNT OF
THE TAXES AND FEES FOR A REGULAR MOTOR VEHICLE LICENSE PLATE;
EXCEPT THAT THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT THE FEE SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 42-3-312 AND AN ADDITIONAL ONE-TIME FEE OF TWENTY-FIVE
DOLLARS FOR ISSUANCE OR REPLACEMENT OF THE SPECIAL LICENSE
PLATES. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE FEE TO THE HIGHWAY
USERS TAX FUND CREATED IN SECTION 43-4-201.
(5) AN APPLICANT MAY APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR
PERSONALIZED EQUAL JUSTICE LICENSE PLATES. UPON PAYMENT OF THE
ADDITIONAL FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 42-3-211 (6)(a) FOR
PERSONALIZED LICENSE PLATES, THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE THE PLATES
IF THE APPLICANT COMPLIES WITH SECTION 42-3-211. IF AN APPLICANT
HAS EXISTING PERSONALIZED LICENSE PLATES FOR A MOTOR VEHICLE, THE
APPLICANT MAY TRANSFER THE COMBINATION OF LETTERS OR NUMBERS
TO A NEW SET OF EQUAL JUSTICE LICENSE PLATES FOR THE VEHICLE UPON
PAYING THE FEE REQUIRED BY SECTION 42-3-211 (6)(a) AND UPON
TURNING IN THE EXISTING PLATES TO THE DEPARTMENT. A PERSON THAT
-5- HB26-1251

HAS OBTAINED PERSONALIZED LICENSE PLATES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
(5) MUST PAY THE ANNUAL FEE IMPOSED BY SECTION 42-3-211 (6)(b) TO
RENEW THE PERSONALIZED PLATES. THE FEES ASSESSED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (5) ARE IN ADDITION TO ALL OTHER APPLICABLE TAXES AND
FEES.
(6) THE EQUAL JUSTICE AUTHORITY SHALL RECEIVE THE MONEY
COLLECTED FROM AN EQUAL JUSTICE LICENSE PLATE DONATION AS SET
FORTH IN SECTION 13-5.7-208 AND DISTRIBUTE THE MONEY RECEIVED IN
THE MANNER SET FORTH IN SECTION 13-5.7-206 (1) AND (2).
(7) THE DEPARTMENT MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE
PURPOSES SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 42-3-312 as
follows:
42-3-312. Special license plate surcharge. In addition to any
other fee imposed by this article 3, an applicant for a special license plate
created by rule in accordance with section 42-3-207, as the section existed
when the plate was created, personalized plates issued under section
42-3-211, or special license plates issued under sections 42-3-212 to
42-3-214, sections 42-3-217 to 42-3-218, sections 42-3-221 to 42-3-234,
sections 42-3-237 to 42-3-258, sections 42-3-260 to 42-3-265, and
sections 42-3-267 to 42-3-271 42-3-272 shall pay an issuance fee of
twenty-five dollars; except that the fee is not imposed on special license
plates exempted from additional fees for the issuance of a military special
license plate by section 42-3-213 (1)(b)(II). The department shall transfer
the money from the fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the
Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account created in section 42-1-211
-6- HB26-1251

(2).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-5.7-203, amend
(1)(i) as follows:
13-5.7-203. General powers.
(1) In addition to any other powers granted to the authority in this
part 2, the authority has the following powers:
(i) To contract for and to accept any gifts, grants, OR DONATIONS,
INCLUDING DONATIONS MADE TO APPLY FOR OR RENEW THE EQUAL
JUSTICE LICENSE PLATE PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-3-272, and loans of
funds, property, or any other aid in any form from the federal
government, the state, any A state agency, or any other source, or any
combination thereof, and to comply, subject to the provisions of this part
2, with the terms and conditions of such contracts or the acceptance of
such items;
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-5.7-206, amend
(1) as follows:
13-5.7-206. Distribution of equal justice fees - purpose.
(1) On July 1, 2025, and each July 1 thereafter EACH YEAR ON
JULY 1, the authority shall annually distribute all money deposited into the
authority's account as required by section 13-5.7-205 (2) SECTIONS
13-5.7-205 (2) AND 13-5.7-208, less the authority's direct and indirect
expenses in administering the requirements of this part 2 and any other
related work completed to advance the mission of the authority. The
authority shall distribute sixty-seven percent of the remaining revenue to
the Colorado recipient of a federal legal services corporation field grant
and thirty-three percent to qualified civil legal aid providers.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 13-5.7-208 as
-7- HB26-1251

follows:
13-5.7-208. Equal justice license plate - donations.
(1) THE AUTHORITY MAY RECEIVE MONEY FROM THE DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE THAT WAS COLLECTED IN THE FORM OF A DONATION MADE BY
A PERSON TO APPLY FOR OR RENEW THEIR REGISTRATION FOR THE EQUAL
JUSTICE LICENSE PLATE PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-3-272.
(2) THE AUTHORITY SHALL DEPOSIT THE MONEY COLLECTED FROM
DONATIONS RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION IN
AN ACCOUNT IN A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION.
(3) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ANNUALLY SET THE REQUIRED
DONATION FOR THE ISSUANCE OR RENEWAL OF THE EQUAL JUSTICE
LICENSE PLATE IN AN AMOUNT OF NOT LESS THAN FIFTY DOLLARS.
(4) MONEY RECEIVED BY THE AUTHORITY FROM THE DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS NOT STATE REVENUE.
SECTION 7. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-8- HB26-1251